Utah statutes.
7-24-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Rollover" means the extension or renewal of the term of a title loan.

(2) (a)  "Title lender" means a person that extends a title loan.

(b)  "Title lender" includes a person that:

(i)  arranges a title loan on behalf of a title lender;

(ii)  acts as an agent for a title lender; or

(iii)  assists a title lender in the extension of a title loan.

(3) (a)  "Title loan" means a loan secured by the title to a:

(i)  motor vehicle, as defined in Section 41-6a-102;

(ii)  mobile home, as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or

(iii)  motorboat, as defined in Section 73-18-2.

(b)  "Title loan" includes a title loan extended at the same premise on which any of the following are sold:

(i)  a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 41-6a-102;

(ii)  a mobile home, as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or

(iii)  a motorboat, as defined in Section 73-18-2.

(c)  "Title loan" does not include:

(i)  a purchase money loan;

(ii)  a loan made in connection with the sale of a:

(A)  motor vehicle, as defined in Section 41-6a-102;

(B)  mobile home, as defined in Section 41-6a-102; or

(C)  motorboat, as defined in Section 73-18-2; or

(iii)  a loan extended by an institution listed in Section 7-24-305.



Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

